Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202015-264
City; keeping prisoners; contract.

Any city of the primary class shall have the right to contract with any other governmental subdivision or agency, whether local, state, or federal, for the keeping of prisoners, either in a facility of the city or in a facility of the other governmental subdivision or agency. Payment shall be made as provided in any such contract or agreement.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 124, p. 124;

R.S.1913, § 4474;

C.S.1922, § 3859;

C.S.1929, § 15-262;

R.S.1943, § 15-264;

Laws 1961, c. 35, § 2, p. 157;

Laws 1969, c. 67, § 1, p. 383;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 74.
November 14, 2020
The 1969 amendments of sections 15-264 and 47-306 did not affect sections 16-252 and 17-566. City of Grand Island v. County of Hall, 196 Neb. 282, 242 N.W.2d 858 (1976).

City is not liable to sheriff but is to county. Douglas County v. Coburn, 34 Neb. 351, 51 N.W. 965 (1892).